Utah statutes.
53A-1a-708.   Enforcement and penalties.

(1) (a)  The board shall require private schools to submit signed affidavits assuring the private school will comply with the requirements of this part.

(b)  If a school fails to submit a signed affidavit after having an opportunity to provide explanations and request delays, the board may:

(i)  deny the private school permission to enroll scholarship students; and

(ii)  interrupt disbursement of or withhold scholarship payments.

(2)  The board may investigate complaints and convene administrative hearings for an alleged violation of this part.

(3)  Upon a finding that this part was violated, the board may:

(a)  deny a private school permission to enroll scholarship students;

(b)  interrupt disbursement of or withhold scholarship payments; or

(c)  issue an order for repayment of scholarship payments fraudulently obtained.



Enacted by Chapter 35, 2005 General Session

